Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.92.040

Voluntary change to electoral system—Authorized.

(1) A political subdivision that conducts an election pursuant to state, county, or local law, is authorized to change its electoral system, including, but not limited to, implementing a district-based election system, or increasing the number of elected officials on a county commission as authorized by RCW 29A.92.115, to remedy a potential violation of RCW 29A.92.020.

(2) If a political subdivision invokes its authority under this section to implement a district-based election system, the districts shall be drawn in a manner consistent with RCW 29A.92.050.

[ 2023 c 56 s 4; 2018 c 113 s 201.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 56: See note following RCW 29A.92.720.